Louisiana, session 2026, HB1116.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:254.4(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§254.4. Surgeon general; office of the surgeon general; functions
* * *
H.(1)(a) Upon receipt of a written referral from the office of public health,
the surgeon general may conduct a review to investigate the transmissions, causes,
and prevention of any suspected public health condition, disease, injury, event,
emergency, or loss of life. Such reviews conducted by the surgeon general are
intended to support public health policymaking and research for the purpose of
informing public health, rather than addressing individual public interest inquiries.
(b) The office of public health shall establish a written procedure for making
written referrals to the surgeon general. Such procedure shall incorporate a protocol
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2728 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1116
to review requests for public health investigations from public and private sources,
including the office of the coroner.
(c) The office of public health shall publish the written procedure to request
public health investigations on its website.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in conducting
the public health review, the surgeon general may access medical records, vital
records, and other health information in the custody or possession of any of the
following:
(a) The office of public health.
(b) Providers or facilities licensed or certified by the Louisiana Department
of Health.
(c) Healthcare professionals licensed or certified pursuant to Title 37 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(d) Other medical or healthcare clinics or laboratories.
(3) The surgeon general shall send a written request, on official letterhead,
to the healthcare provider, facility, or professional or the office of public health to
obtain access to medical records, vital records, or other health information. Copies
of the requested records and health information shall be provided to the surgeon
general in a secure electronic format. The records and health information shall be
confidential and shall not be utilized by the surgeon general for any purpose other
than the public health review.
(4)(a) The surgeon general, upon conclusion of the review, may issue a
public health guidance to the healthcare provider, facility, or professional or to the
public on the specific public health issue reviewed.
(b) If the public health guidance is issued to the healthcare provider, facility,
or professional, the public health guidance may be published on the Louisiana
Department of Health's website if deemed appropriate by the surgeon general.
However, if the public health guidance is issued to the public in general, the public
health guidance shall be published on the department's website.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2728 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1116
(5)(a) The surgeon general's review and conclusions, other than the public
health guidance issued pursuant to Paragraph (4) of this Subsection, shall be
confidential. The surgeon general shall not be compelled to testify about the review
or conclusions in any civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding.
(b) All medical records, vital records, and other health information obtained
by the surgeon general in accordance with the provisions of this Subsection shall be
confidential and shall not be available for subpoena nor be disclosed, discoverable,
or compelled to be produced in any civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, or
other proceeding. Additionally, the records and information shall not be deemed
admissible as evidence in any civil, criminal, administrative, or other tribunal or
court for any reason.
(6) The surgeon general's review or conclusions shall not be referred to any
professional licensing board or agency for action against the license or certification
of the healthcare provider, facility, professional, or clinic.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4(65) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Applicability
This Chapter shall not apply:
* * *
(65) To any information, documents, records, notes, files, communications,
or results that are received, generated, made, or maintained for or in connection with
the public health review conducted by the surgeon general pursuant to R.S.
36:254.4(H).
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2728 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1116